Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43 of Chapter 95, Laws of 2024, is amended as follows: Section 43.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1(a) of this act, One Million Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,400,000.00) is provided for the continuation of * * * a the current school * * * mapping program safety platform. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.